Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,135
Information to subscribers and enrollees.

Each health maintenance organization shall provide a list of providers to its subscribers upon enrollment and reenrollment. Each health maintenance organization shall provide notice within thirty days of any material change in the operation of the health maintenance organization to its subscribers if the change affects the subscribers directly. An enrollee shall be notified in writing by the health maintenance organization of the termination of the primary care provider who provided health care services to that enrollee. The health maintenance organization shall provide assistance to the enrollee in transferring to another participating provider. Each health maintenance organization shall provide to subscribers information on how services may be obtained and where additional information on access to services can be obtained and a toll-free telephone number for calls within the service area.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 44.